Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201469-408
Violation; penalty.

Any
person violating any of the provisions of sections 69-401 to 69-409 is guilty
of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 5.